Maine, session 132, LD1994.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 4 MRSA §161, as amended by PL 1995, c. 388, §1 and affected by §8, is
further amended by amending the section headnote to read:
§161. Justice of the peace; appointment; duties; salary; immunity
Sec. 2. 4 MRSA §161, as amended by PL 1995, c. 388, §1 and affected by §8, is
further amended by enacting after the 3rd paragraph a new paragraph to read:
A person authorized to serve as a justice of the peace is immune from any civil liability,
to the same extent as employees of governmental entities under the Maine Tort Claims Act,
for acts performed within the scope of the person's justice of the peace duties.
Page 1 - 132LR2810(03)